Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 3. Joint Armed Services Committee.

Revisor’s notes. —

AS

24.20.650

—

24.20.675

was enacted by ch. 6, SLA 1999 and repealed, effective January 1, 2009 under § 3, ch. 6, SLA 1999.
Under §§ 1 and 2, ch. 1, SLA 2009, effective February 17, 2009, the repeals made by § 3, ch. 6, SLA 1999 were themselves repealed “retroactive to January 1, 2009, and revive” each of the sections in AS

24.20.650

—

24.20.675

.

Sec. 24.20.650.
Joint Armed Services Committee established.

The Joint Armed Services Committee is established as a permanent interim committee of the legislature.

The committee is composed of

five members of the senate, at least one of whom is a member of the minority, appointed by the president of the senate;

five members of the house of representatives, at least one of whom is a member of the minority, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives after considering the recommendations of the Alaska chapters of each of the following organizations:

the Association of the United States Army;

the Air Force Association;

the Navy League of the United States;

the Marine Corps Association;

a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives after considering the recommendation of the Seventeenth Coast Guard District Auxiliary;

a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives after considering the recommendation of the mayor of the Municipality of Anchorage;

a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives after considering the recommendation of the mayor of the Fairbanks North Star Borough;

a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives after considering the recommendation of the adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs; and

a state resident, other than a member of the state legislature, who is appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives after considering the joint recommendations of the Alaska Federation of Natives and the Alaska Municipal League.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 11.

Sec. 24.20.655.
Terms of office; vacancies.

Each legislative member serves for the duration of the legislature during which the member is appointed. Each public member serves for three years. An individual who has served on the committee may be reappointed.

A legislator ceases to be a member of the Joint Armed Services Committee if the legislator ceases to be a member of the house from which the legislator was appointed. When a seat on the committee becomes vacant, it shall be filled within 30 days in the manner of the original appointment. An individual appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the remainder of the term to which appointed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1999)

Sec. 24.20.660.
Travel and per diem allowances.

Members of the Joint Armed Services Committee are entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses. Members of the committee shall receive per diem allowances in accordance with the policy adopted by the legislative council under AS

24.10.130(c)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1999)

Sec. 24.20.665.
Meetings.

Eight members of the Joint Armed Services Committee constitute a quorum.

The committee members shall select one member from the senate and one member from the house of representatives to serve as co-chairs of the committee.

The committee may meet during sessions of the legislature and during intervals between sessions at the times and places the co-chairs may determine. Whenever possible, meetings shall be teleconferenced to reduce travel cost.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1999)

Sec. 24.20.670.
Administration.

The legislative council shall provide administrative and other services to the Joint Armed Services Committee. Within the limits of the amounts made available to the committee by the legislative council, the committee may make expenditures and enter into contracts to carry out the purposes of AS

24.20.650

—

24.20.675

. Contracts must be approved by a majority of the members of the committee and are otherwise subject to procedures adopted by the legislative council under AS

36.30.020

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1999)

Sec. 24.20.675.
Powers and duties.

The Joint Armed Services Committee shall

monitor the military base realignment and closure activities of the federal government for bases in the state;

work on specific realignments and closures proposed by the federal government for bases in the state;

work with the state’s congressional delegation regarding federal military base realignments and closings in the state;

attend meetings and hearings related to federal realignments and closures of military bases in the state and provide testimony as necessary;

review the effect on the state and its communities of federal realignments and closures of military bases in the state;

monitor the development of the national ballistic missile defense system and work with the congressional delegation of the state, other state and local government organizations, and community groups to advocate and expedite the deployment of the system in this state;

investigate opportunities to increase joint and combined military training in the state;

advocate the stationing of reconfigured power projection forces at bases located in the state; and

prepare and submit a report of its activities to the legislature on the first day of each second regular session.

The committee may appoint a citizens’ advisory board. Individuals appointed to an advisory board may not receive reimbursement for travel expenses or per diem allowances.

History.

(§ 2 ch 6 SLA 1999)

Sec. 24.20.680.
Legislative review. [Repealed, § 23 ch 179 SLA 2004.]